Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7529
False or misleading information; prohibited acts.

No person shall willfully withhold information that will affect the forms applicable, dividends payable, or rates or premiums chargeable from the director or any statistical agent, advisory organization, or insurer. No person shall knowingly give false or misleading information that will affect the policy forms applicable, dividends payable, or rates or premiums chargeable to the director or any statistical agent, advisory organization, or insurer. A person who violates this section shall be subject to provisions of section 44-7530.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 29.